Massachusetts, session 194th, S2425.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Bridge number N-06-024(3Y0), Philips Road over Route 140, in the City of New
Bedford shall be designated and known as the Corporal Francis J. McHugh Memorial Bridge, in
memory of Corporal Francis J. McHugh, a veteran of the United States Army. Corporal
McHugh served during World War II and was awarded the Silver Star for the gallantry of his
actions in saving a fellow soldier with disregard for his own life. The Massachusetts Department
of Transportation shall erect and maintain suitable markers bearing the designation in
compliance with the standards of the department.
of 1